Massachusetts, session 194th, H2334.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after inserting after
section 2DDDDDD the following section:-
Section 2EEEEEE: There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund known as the Municipal Sustainability Director Fund. The fund
shall be credited with appropriations or other money authorized or transferred by the general
court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall be
expended to support cities and towns to fund an environmental sustainability director position.
Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund. The
fund shall not be subject to section 5C of chapter 29.
of 1